Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-605
City manager plan; petition for adoption; election.

Whenever electors of any city, equal in number to twenty percent of those who voted at the last regular city election, shall file a petition with the city clerk, asking that the question of organizing the city under the plan of government provided in sections 19-601 to 19-648 be submitted to the electors thereof, said clerk shall within one week certify that fact to the council of the city, and the council shall, within thirty days, adopt a resolution to provide for submitting such question at a special election to be held not less than thirty days after the adoption of the resolution except as provided in this section. Any such election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of the state except as otherwise provided in sections 19-601 to 19-648. If such petition is filed not more than one hundred eighty days nor less than seventy days prior to the regular municipal statewide primary or statewide general election, the council shall adopt a resolution to provide for submitting such question at the next such election.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 6, p. 498;

C.S.1922, § 4543;

C.S.1929, § 19-606;

R.S.1943, § 19-605;

Laws 1974, LB 897, § 2.